Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1313.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2702. Residents.* * *(a.1) Native Pennsylvanian Annual License.--The commission shall issue annual Pennsylvania hunting licenses known as the Native Pennsylvanian Annual License. The issuance of a license shall be subject to the following: (1) The license may be issued to a nonresident who meets either of the following:(i) The nonresident was born in this Commonwealth.(ii) The nonresident has a living parent or former guardian who resides in this Commonwealth.<--123456789101112131415161718 (2) The license shall cost the same as a resident license under section 2709 (relating to license costs and fees).(3) An applicant must provide a current photo identification card and the applicable documentation under one of the following:(i) For an applicant who qualifies under paragraph (1)(i), either of the following:(A) A certified copy of the applicant's original birth certificate showing that the applicant was born in this Commonwealth or that the applicant's parent's address was in this Commonwealth at the time of the applicant's birth.(B) A written affirmation that the applicant was born in this Commonwealth.(ii) For an applicant who qualifies under paragraph (1)(ii), proof of the living parent or former guardian's address within this Commonwealth.(4) A first-time applicant for a Native Pennsylvanian annual license must submit the application to the commission.(5) A Native Pennsylvanian annual license shall be identical to an annual resident license sold by the commission and shall be properly designated "Native Pennsylvanian."(6) All regular annual licenses offered to residents shall be made available to an applicant who qualifies as a Native Pennsylvanian. This paragraph shall not apply to a lifetime license.(7) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit eligibility for a resident hunter's license under 20260SB1313PN1839 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b).(8) An applicant who provides a false written affirmation under paragraph (3)(i)(B) shall be subject to section 2711(a)(2) and (b)(3) (relating to unlawful acts concerning licenses) and 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 34 (GAME) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN HUNTING AND FURTAKING LICENSES, PROVIDING FOR NATIVE PENNSYLVANIAN ANNUAL LICENSE; AND IMPOSING PENALTIES.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. TITLE 34 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 2703.1. NATIVE PENNSYLVANIAN ANNUAL LICENSE.(A) ISSUANCE.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE AN ANNUAL PENNSYLVANIA HUNTING LICENSE, KNOWN AS THE NATIVE PENNSYLVANIAN ANNUAL LICENSE, SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE LICENSE MAY BE ISSUED TO A NONRESIDENT WHO:(I) WAS BORN IN THIS COMMONWEALTH; OR(II) PREVIOUSLY RESIDED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(2) THE LICENSE SHALL COST $30 FOR A PERIOD OF FIVE DAYS AND SHALL BE VALID ONLY DURING THE DEER REGULAR FIREARMS SEASON.(3) AN APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE MUST PROVIDE A CURRENT PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD AND THE FOLLOWING APPLICABLE DOCUMENTATION:(I) IF THE APPLICANT QUALIFIES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I), A WRITTEN AFFIRMATION THAT THE APPLICANT WAS BORN IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.20260SB1313PN1839 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 (II) IF THE APPLICANT QUALIFIES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II), PROOF OF THE APPLICANT'S FORMER RESIDENCY IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(4) A FIRST-TIME APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE MUST SUBMIT THE APPLICATION TO THE COMMISSION.(5) THE LICENSE SHALL BE PROPERLY DESIGNATED "NATIVE PENNSYLVANIAN."(B) CONSTRUCTION.--N OTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT ELIGIBILITY FOR A RESIDENT HUNTER'S LICENSE UNDER SECTION 2702(B) (RELATING TO RESIDENTS).(C) PENALTIES.--IF AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION PROVIDES A FALSE WRITTEN AFFIRMATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3)(I), THE APPLICANT SHALL BE SUBJECT TO SECTION 2711(A)(2) AND (B)(3) (RELATING TO UNLAWFUL ACTS CONCERNING LICENSES) AND 18 PA.C.S. § 4904 (RELATING TO UNSWORN FALSIFICATION TO AUTHORITIES).SECTION 2. THE ADDITION OF 34 PA.C.S. § 2703.1 SHALL APPLY TO THE 2027-2028 DEER REGULAR FIREARMS SEASON AND EACH DEER REGULAR FIREARMS SEASON THEREAFTER.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260SB1313PN1839 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920